Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1475.01
State or local law enforcement agency; authorized to receive forfeited property.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the laws of the State of Nebraska, any state or local law enforcement agency which participated directly with federal law enforcement agencies in any of the acts which led to the seizure or forfeiture of property being held by federal law enforcement agencies shall be authorized to receive such property directly from the federal government.

Laws 1985, LB 247, § 6.